utilities/dictionaries/sv_SV-Swedish.aff
# Som vecka: vecko- (dag)
# Som psyke: psyko- (analys)
# Som land: lant- (brukare)
SFX  x  N  3
SFX  x  a  o/WXZ  a
SFX  x  e  o/WXZ  e
SFX  x  d  t/WXZ  d

# Som vara: varu- (hus)
# Som maximum: maximi- (gräns)
SFX  w  N  2
SFX  w  a   u/WXZ  a
SFX  w  um  i/WXZ  um

# Som pepparkaka: pepparkaks- (hus)
# Som yrke: yrkes- (man)
# Som förhand: förhands- (granskning)
SFX  v  N  2
SFX  v  a  s/WXZ  a
SFX  v  0  s/WXZ  [^a]

SFX  f  N  2
SFX  f  a  s/WUZ  a
SFX  f  0  s/WUZ  [^a]

# Som hyra: hyres- (gäst)
# Som säd: sädes- (fält)
# Som ansikte: ansikts- (uttryck)
SFX  u  N  3
SFX  u  a  es/WXZ  a
SFX  u  e  s/WXZ  e
SFX  u  0  es/WXZ  [^ae]

SFX  i  N  3
SFX  i  a  es/WUZ  a
SFX  i  e  s/WUZ  e
SFX  i  0  es/WUZ  [^ae]

# Som tavla: tavel- (försäljare)
# Som stämma: stäm- (gaffel)
# Som timme: tim- (lön)
# Som siffra: siffer- (kombination)
# Som förälder: föräldra- (möte)
# Som äpple: äppel- (must)
# Som gymnasium: gymnasie- (elev)
# Som ängel: ängla- (vakt)
SFX  t  N  8
SFX  t  la  el/WXZ  la
SFX  t  ma  0/WXZ   ma
SFX  t  me  0/WXZ   me
SFX  t  ra  er/WXZ  ra
SFX  t  er  ra/WXZ  er
SFX  t  le  el/WXZ  le
SFX  t  um  e/WXZ   um
SFX  t  el  la/WXZ  el

SFX  s  N  1
SFX  s  0  0/WX  .

SFX  r  N  1
SFX  r  0  -/WX  .

SFX  b  N  1
SFX  b  0  -  .

# Flags used in COMPOUNDRULE definitions:
# 0 - any nonletter character listed in WORDCHARS above, or the letter x
# 1 - a digit (0-9)
# 2 - number written in letters (1-100)
# 3 - numeric middle compund
# 6 - numeric suffix
# 4 - multiple of 100 written in letters (100,200,...,2000)
# 5 - thousand, million, billion
# - - The dash character
# 7 - The words first,second,third,...,hundredth
# 8 - word that is a suffix to #7 above.

# Compound rules:
# 0* - All strings without letters, e.g. 12:3-3
# 1*-6 - number followed by suffix, e.g. 87-åringens
# 4?2?5?6 - as above but with letters, e.g. åttiosjuåringen
# 1*-3Y - number followed by compound suffix, e.g. 60-talsinredning
# 4?23Y - as above but with letters, e.g. nittonhundrasextiotalsinredning
# 43Y - as above, e.g. nittonhundratalsinredning
# 4?2?53Y - as above, e.g. sjuhundrafemtiotusenkronorsstugan
# 42  - a number written in letters, e.g. trehundratjugonio
# 4?2?54?2? - as above, e.g. sjuhundrafemtiotretusentrehundratjugonio
# 4?2?54?2?54?2? - as above, e.g. tvåhundratrettonmiljonerfemhundrasjuttontusenelva
# for adjectives: )k
# for verbs: >j

#pragma no-merge 268¤jkc

COMPOUNDRULE 12
COMPOUNDRULE 0*
COMPOUNDRULE 1*-6
COMPOUNDRULE 4?5?4?5?4?2?6
COMPOUNDRULE 1*-3U*Y
COMPOUNDRULE 4?5?4?23U*Y
COMPOUNDRULE 4?5?43U*Y
COMPOUNDRULE 4?5?4?53U*Y
COMPOUNDRULE 4?5?4?5?4?5?4?2?
COMPOUNDRULE 47
COMPOUNDRULE 4?78
COMPOUNDRULE >j
COMPOUNDRULE )k

#pragma ignore-start
SFX  1  Y  8
SFX  1  0  :a  .
SFX  1  0  :as  .
SFX  1  0  :an  .
SFX  1  0  :ans  .
SFX  1  0  :or  .
SFX  1  0  :ors  .
SFX  1  0  :orna  .
SFX  1  0  :ornas  .

SFX  7  Y  26
SFX  7  0  -  .
SFX  7  0  s  .
SFX  7  a  e  a
SFX  7  a  es  a
SFX  7  0  l  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  ls  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  len  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  lens  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  lar  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  lars  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  larna  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  larnas  [oe]nde
SFX  7  0  del  .
SFX  7  0  dels-  .
SFX  7  0  dels/WX  .
SFX  7  0  delen  .
SFX  7  0  delens  .
SFX  7  0  delar  .
SFX  7  0  delars  .
SFX  7  0  delarna  .
SFX  7  0  delarnas  .
SFX  7  0  dags/WX  .
SFX  7  0  hands/WXZ  .
SFX  7  0  pris/WX  .
SFX  7  0  generations/WX  .
SFX  7  0  parts/WX  .
#pragma ignore-end
